Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Mississippi Site Development Grant Fund

§ 57-1-701.
Mississippi Site Development Grant Fund created; definitions; use of funds; application; annual report.

For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Eligible entity” means any (i) county, (ii) municipality or (iii) public or private nonprofit local economic development entity including, but not limited to, local authorities, commissions, or other entities created by local and private legislation or pursuant to Section 19-5-99.

“Eligible expenditures” means:

Fees for architects, engineers, environmental consultants, attorneys, and such other advisors, consultants and agents that MDA determines are necessary to complete site due diligence associated with site development improvements located on industrial property that is publicly owned; and/or

Contributions toward site development improvements, as approved by MDA, located on industrial property that is publicly owned.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Site development improvements” means site clearing, grading, and environmental mitigation; improvements to drainage systems; easement and right-of-way acquisition; sewer systems; transportation directly affecting the site, including roads, bridges or rail; bulkheads; land reclamation; water supply (storage, treatment and distribution); aesthetic improvements; the dredging of channels and basins; or other improvements as approved by MDA.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Mississippi Site Development Grant Fund,” which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be used to make grants to assist eligible entities as provided in this section.

Monies in the fund which are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Section 2 of Chapter 390, Laws of 2017, Section 5 of Chapter 412, Laws of 2018, or Section 1 of Chapter 421, Laws of 2019, may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by MDA. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued. Reimbursements under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

MDA shall establish a program to make grants to eligible entities to match local or other funds associated with improving the marketability of publicly owned industrial property for industrial economic development purposes and other property improvements as approved by MDA. An eligible entity may apply to MDA for a grant under this program in the manner provided for in this section. An eligible entity desiring assistance under this section must provide matching funds in an amount determined by MDA. Matching funds may be provided in the form of cash and/or in-kind services as determined by MDA.

An eligible entity desiring assistance under this section must submit an application to MDA. The application must include:

A description of the eligible expenditures for which assistance is requested;

The amount of assistance requested;

The amount and type of matching funds to be provided by the eligible entity; and

Any other information required by MDA.

Upon request by MDA, an eligible entity shall provide MDA with access to all studies, reports, documents and/or plans developed as a result of or related to an eligible entity receiving assistance under this section.

MDA shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section.

MDA shall file an annual report with the Governor, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, describing all assistance provided under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 412, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 421, §2, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

Joint Legislative Committee Note —

Section 2 of Chapter 421, Laws of 2019, effective July 1, 2019 (approved March 28, 2019), amended this section. Section 6 of Chapter 453, Laws of 2019, effective July 1, 2019 (approved April 12, 2019), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 6 of Chapter 453, Laws of 2019, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes §57-1-701
as amended by Chapter 421 Laws of 2019.

§ 57-1-731.
Mississippi Ports Improvements Fund created; purpose; source and use of monies; accounting and reimbursement of certain costs; establishment of grant program; application; Ports Improvements Fund Advisory Committee created; composition.

There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Mississippi Ports Improvements Fund which shall consist of monies from any source designated for deposit into the fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Mississippi Development Authority (MDA) for the purposes authorized in subsection (2) of this section.

Monies in the fund that are derived from the proceeds of general obligation bonds may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the MDA in providing grants under this section using general obligation bonds. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained for each grant by the MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs for assistance shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the proceeds of bonds issued for such assistance. Reimbursements made under this paragraph shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The MDA shall establish a program to make grants from the Mississippi Ports Improvements Fund to assist in paying a portion of the costs associated with the repair, rehabilitation, construction, reconstruction, upgrading and improvement of existing port facilities, including projects necessary to ensure safety and structural integrity of such facilities.

An entity desiring a grant under this section shall submit an application to the MDA which shall include, at a minimum:

A description, including the cost, of the requested assistance;

A description of the purpose for which the assistance is requested; and

Any other information required by the MDA.

There is hereby created the Ports Improvements Fund Advisory Committee whose membership shall consist of:

Six (6) directors of ports, appointed by the President of the Mississippi Ports Council, or his or her designee, as follows: two (2) directors of the coastal ports, two (2) directors of inland river ports located on the Mississippi River and two (2) directors of inland ports located on the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway; and

The Executive Director of the MDA, or his or her designee.

The MDA, in consultation with the Ports Improvements Fund Advisory Committee, shall provide grants under this section. The terms of a grant shall be within the discretion of the MDA.

The MDA shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, including the establishing of requirements for matching funds and criteria regarding the evaluation of applications for assistance. The MDA shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation and administration of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 414, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.